Tennessee, session 114, SB2399.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-50-119(b)(1)(A)(i)(a), is amended
by deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(a) A licensed professional counselor under title 63, chapter 22, part 1;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 33-1-101(20), is amended by
deleting "professional counselor" and substituting "limited practice professional counselor;
professional counselor".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 33-3-201(a)(2), is amended by
adding "limited practice professional counselor," immediately after "certified or licensed
professional counselor,".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 33-6-802, is amended by adding
"limited practice professional counselor," immediately after "licensed professional counselor,".
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 33-6-804(a), is amended by adding
"limited practice professional counselor," immediately after "licensed professional counselor,".
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-6-413(b)(5)(C)(v), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(v) A licensed professional counselor, as defined in § 63-22-122;
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-6-413(b)(5)(C), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
(ix) A limited practice professional counselor, as defined in § 63-22-122.
SB2399
011124
- 1 -

SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-2-124(c), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(10) Limited practice professional counselor.
SECTION 9. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 52-1-101(14), is amended by
deleting "professional counselor" and substituting "limited practice professional counselor,
licensed professional counselor".
SECTION 10. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 52-3-201(a)(2), is amended by
adding "limited practice professional counselor," immediately after "certified or licensed
professional counselor,".
SECTION 11. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-2401(a), is amended by
adding "a duly licensed limited practice professional counselor, as defined in § 63-22-122;"
immediately after "as defined in § 63-22-115;".
SECTION 12. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-2401(a), is amended by
adding "by a duly licensed limited practice professional counselor;" immediately after "by a duly
licensed marital and family therapist;".
SECTION 13. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-1-125(e)(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(2) A marriage and family therapist, professional counselor, limited practice
professional counselor, or pastoral counselor certified or licensed under chapter 22 of
this title;
SECTION 14. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-1-201(2), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(K) Limited practice professional counselor licensed under chapter 22 of this
title.
- 2 - 011124

SECTION 15. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-11-222(b)(4), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(4) Has been practicing as a licensed professional counselor or a limited practice
professional counselor for a period of six (6) or more years in this state;
SECTION 16. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-11-302(6)(I), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(I) Licensed professional counselor or professional counselor candidate;
SECTION 17. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-11-302(6), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
(M) Limited practice professional counselor or a limited practice professional
counselor candidate;
SECTION 18. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-11-409(b), is amended by
deleting subdivisions (3) and (4) and substituting:
(3) A limited practice professional counselor under chapter 22 of this title;
(4) A licensed professional counselor under chapter 22 of this title;
SECTION 19. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-22-102, is amended by deleting
subdivisions (2) and (4) and substituting:
(2) Upon payment of a nonrefundable fee as set by the board, review the
credentials of licensure of a limited practice professional counselor and professional
counselor applicant to determine if the applicant is eligible for licensure;
(4) License an applicant who meets the requirements in this part for a licensed
professional counselor or limited practice professional counselor and establish by rule
any additional qualifications of the applicant necessary for the practice of counseling as
provided in this part;
- 3 - 011124

SECTION 20. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-22-104, is amended by deleting
"professional counselor" and substituting "limited practice professional counselor".
SECTION 21. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-22-104, is amended by
designating the existing language as subsection (a) and adding the following as a new
subsection:
(b) An applicant for licensure as a professional counselor shall comply with all
requirements described in subsection (a) and shall meet the following requirements:
(1) Complete coursework specifically related to the diagnosis, treatment,
appraisal, and assessment of mental disorders; and
(2) Complete two (2) years of postgraduate supervised experience
required for licensure in a clinical setting that provides substantial opportunities to
diagnose, treat, appraise, and assess mental disorders.
SECTION 22. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-22-107, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
(a) Beginning July 1, 2026, an applicant for licensure as a limited practice
professional counselor and a professional counselor shall:
(1) Meet the requirements of §§ 63-22-104 and 63-22-110; and
(2) Pass an examination as adopted and administered by the board.
(b) A person who was certified as a professional counselor on or before June 30,
1991, may retain the person's certification indefinitely by meeting current renewal
requirements or upgrade to be licensed as a limited practice professional counselor.
(c)
(1) A person who is a licensed professional counselor as of June 30,
2026, must be converted to a limited practice professional counselor license.
- 4 - 011124

(2) The board shall reissue the person as described in subdivision (c)(1)
a limited practice professional counselor license.
(d)
(1) Beginning July 1, 2028, the board shall not issue a new license for a
limited practice professional counselor.
(2) A person who is a licensed limited practice professional counselor as
of June 30, 2028, may retain the person's license indefinitely by meeting current
renewal requirements or upgrade to be licensed as a licensed professional
counselor by meeting the additional requirements as described in § 63-22-
104(b).
(e)
(1) Beginning July 1, 1991, an applicant for licensure as a licensed
marital and family therapist shall:
(1) Meet the requirements of § 63-22-103(a) or § 63-22-106; and
(2) Pass such examinations as may be administered by the
board.
(2) Beginning July 1, 1991, the board shall not issue marital and family
therapist certifications. A person certified as a marital and family therapist on or
before June 30, 1991, may maintain certification or upgrade from certification to
licensure by any of the following methods:
(A) By acquiring the minimum standards provided in § 63-22-
106(3);
(B) By receiving two hundred (200) hours clinical supervision from
not more than two (2) supervisors deemed qualified by the board; or
- 5 - 011124

(C) By validating fifteen (15) years of clinical practice while
maintaining certification by continuing a practice of marital and family
therapy.
SECTION 23. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-22-116(a)(1), is amended by
deleting "a professional counselor" and substituting "a limited practice professional counselor or
licensed professional counselor".
SECTION 24. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-22-116(a)(1)(B), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(B)
(i) The applicant has a conferred graduate degree consisting of a
minimum of fifty-two (52) hours in counseling or a related field from an accredited
program that were earned prior to 2016; and
(ii) The applicant has practiced as a licensed professional counselor or a
limited practice professional counselor for a minimum of twenty-five (25) years
and meets the requirements of § 63-22-104(a)(4)-(7).
SECTION 25. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-22-116(a)(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision.
SECTION 26. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-22-117(a)(1)(A), is amended by
deleting "such as, "licensed professional counselor" without being" and substituting "such as,
"licensed professional counselor" or "limited practice professional counselor" without being".
SECTION 27. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-22-117(b), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(b) This part does not permit a person licensed or certified as a professional
counselor or limited practice professional counselor to engage in the practice of licensed
psychological examiner, licensed senior psychological examiner, certified psychological
- 6 - 011124

assistant, licensed psychologist, licensed social worker, psychiatric nurse, law, or
medicine.
SECTION 28. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-22-117(c), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(c) This part does not apply to a person if the person is preparing for the practice
of counseling.
SECTION 29. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-22-117(d), is amended by
adding "or limited practice professional counselors" immediately after "licensed professional
counselors".
SECTION 30. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-22-118(a), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(a) Notwithstanding § 63-22-122, this part does not apply to the following:
(1) A person regulated by the board of nursing or the state board of
education; or
(2) A professional counselor employed in a community or human service
agency and working directly under the supervision of a licensed professional
counselor or a limited practice professional counselor.
SECTION 31. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-22-120, is amended by deleting
the section.
SECTION 32. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-22-121(a)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(1) An associate license may be issued by the board for a licensed professional
counselor or a limited practice professional counselor applicant who has completed the
academic coursework and training required for the license sought and who has
successfully passed the examination required by the board.
- 7 - 011124

SECTION 33. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-22-122, is amended by deleting
subdivisions (3) and (5) and substituting:
(3) "Limited practice professional counselor":
(A) Means a person licensed under this part who is professionally trained
in counseling and guidance services designed to facilitate normal human growth
and development through individual, family, or group counseling; who is
professionally trained in educational procedures, assessment, consultation, and
research; and who assists individuals by the practice of counseling with their
personal, social, career, or educational development as they pass through life
stages; and
(B) Does not include the ability to appraise, assess, diagnose, or treat
conditions attributable to a mental disorder;
(5)
(A) "Licensed professional counselor" means a person licensed under
this part:
(i) Who is professionally trained in counseling and guidance
services designed to facilitate normal human growth and development
through individual, family, or group counseling; who is professionally
trained in educational procedures, assessment, consultation, and
research; and who assists individuals by the practice of counseling with
their personal, social, career, or educational development as they pass
through life stages; and
(ii) The application of mental health and human development
principles in order to:
- 8 - 011124

(a) Facilitate human development and adjustment
throughout the life span;
(b) Prevent, diagnose, and treat mental, emotional, or
behavioral disorders and associated disorders that interfere with
mental health;
(c) Conduct assessments and diagnoses for the purpose
of establishing treatment goals and objectives within the
limitations prescribed in subdivision (1); and
(d) Plan, implement, and evaluate treatment plans using
counseling treatment interventions.
(B) This subdivision (5) does not permit:
(i) The performance of any act that a licensed professional
counselor is not educated and trained to perform; or
(ii) The designation of testing reports as psychological.
(C) As used in this subdivision (5), "counseling treatment interventions"
means the application of cognitive, affective, behavioral, and systemic counseling
strategies that include principles of development, wellness, and pathology that
reflect a pluralistic society.
SECTION 34. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-22-206(a)(4), is amended by
deleting "a professional counselor designated as a mental health service provider" and
substituting "a licensed professional counselor".
SECTION 35. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-32-102(b), is amended by
deleting "professional counselor" and substituting "limited practice professional counselor,
licensed professional counselor".
- 9 - 011124

SECTION 36. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-24-604, is amended by adding
"limited practice professional counselor," immediately after "licensed professional counselor,".
SECTION 37. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to licenses applied for or renewed on or after that date.
- 10 - 011124